dictsource/mr_rules
.group ठ
        ठ          t.#V
        _L23) ठ (L21_            t.#@4    // generated
        _L23) ठ (L21L22_         t.#@4    // generated
        _L23) ठ (L21             t.#@4    // generated
        _L22L23) ठ (L21_         t.#@4    // generated
        _L22L23) ठ (L21L22_      t.#@4    // generated
        _L22L23) ठ (L21          t.#@4    // generated
        L23) ठ (L21_             t.#@4    // generated
        L23) ठ (L21L22_          t.#@4    // generated
        L23) ठ (L21              t.#@4    // generated
        _्) ठ (L21_              t.#@4    // generated
        _्) ठ (L21L22_           t.#@4    // generated
        _्) ठ (L21               t.#@4    // generated
        _L22्) ठ (L21_           t.#@4    // generated
        _L22्) ठ (L21L22_        t.#@4    // generated
        _L22्) ठ (L21            t.#@4    // generated
        ्) ठ (L21_               t.#@4    // generated
        ्) ठ (L21L22_            t.#@4    // generated
        ्) ठ (L21                t.#@4    // generated
        _L21L23) ठ (L21L20_      t.#      // generated
        _L21L23) ठ (L21L20       t.#      // generated
        L21L23) ठ (L21L20_       t.#      // generated
        L21L23) ठ (L21L20        t.#      // generated
        _L22) ठ (L21्_           t.#@4    // generated
        _L22) ठ (L21्            t.#@4    // generated
        _L22L22) ठ (L21्_        t.#@4    // generated
        _L22L22) ठ (L21्         t.#@4    // generated
        L22) ठ (L21्_            t.#@4    // generated
        L22) ठ (L21्             t.#@4    // generated
        _ा) ठ (L21L21_           t.#      // generated
        _L22ा) ठ (L21L21_        t.#      // generated
        ा) ठ (L21L21_            t.#      // generated
        _L21) ठ (L21L22्         t.#      // generated
        _L22L21) ठ (L21L22्      t.#      // generated
        L21) ठ (L21L22्          t.#      // generated
        _L22) ठ (L24_            t.#@4    // generated
        _L22) ठ (L24L22_         t.#@4    // generated
        _L22) ठ (L24             t.#@4    // generated
        _L22L22) ठ (L24_         t.#@4    // generated
        _L22L22) ठ (L24L22_      t.#@4    // generated
        _L22L22) ठ (L24          t.#@4    // generated
        L22) ठ (L24_             t.#@4    // generated
        L22) ठ (L24L22_          t.#@4    // generated
        L22) ठ (L24              t.#@4    // generated
        _L20) ठ (L21L23_         t.#      // generated
        _L20) ठ (L21L23          t.#      // generated
        _L22L20) ठ (L21L23_      t.#      // generated
        _L22L20) ठ (L21L23       t.#      // generated
        L20) ठ (L21L23_          t.#      // generated
        L20) ठ (L21L23           t.#      // generated
        _L22) ठ (L21L22L23       t.#@4    // generated
        _L22L22) ठ (L21L22L23    t.#@4    // generated
        L22) ठ (L21L22L23        t.#@4    // generated
        _L22) ठ (L21_            t.#@4    // generated
        _L22L22) ठ (L21_         t.#@4    // generated
        L22) ठ (L21_             t.#@4    // generated
        _L22) ठ (L23_            t.#@4    // generated
        _L22) ठ (L23L22_         t.#@4    // generated
        _L22) ठ (L23             t.#@4    // generated
        _L22L22) ठ (L23_         t.#@4    // generated
        _L22L22) ठ (L23L22_      t.#@4    // generated
        _L22L22) ठ (L23          t.#@4    // generated
        L22) ठ (L23_             t.#@4    // generated
        L22) ठ (L23L22_          t.#@4    // generated
        L22) ठ (L23              t.#@4    // generated
        _L22) ठ (L21L22ण         t.#      // generated
        _L22) ठ (लL21_           t.#      // generated
        _L22L22) ठ (लL21_        t.#      // generated
        L22) ठ (लL21_            t.#      // generated
        _L20) ठ (L21ण_           t.#      // generated
        _L22L20) ठ (L21ण_        t.#      // generated
        L20) ठ (L21ण_            t.#      // generated
        _L20) ठ (L21L22्         t.#      // generated
        _L22L20) ठ (L21L22्      t.#      // generated
        L20) ठ (L21L22्          t.#      // generated
        ठ (B       t.#
        
        ठ्ठ          t.#:V   // t.#t.# -> t.#:
        ठ्ठ (B       t.#:
        
.group ड
        ड          d.V
        _L23) ड (L21_            d.@4     // generated
        _L23) ड (L21L22_         d.@4     // generated
        _L23) ड (L21             d.@4     // generated
        _L22L23) ड (L21_         d.@4     // generated
        _L22L23) ड (L21L22_      d.@4     // generated
        _L22L23) ड (L21          d.@4     // generated
        L23) ड (L21_             d.@4     // generated
        L23) ड (L21L22_          d.@4     // generated
        L23) ड (L21              d.@4     // generated
        _्) ड (L21_              d.@4     // generated
        _्) ड (L21L22_           d.@4     // generated
        _्) ड (L21               d.@4     // generated
        _L22्) ड (L21_           d.@4     // generated
        _L22्) ड (L21L22_        d.@4     // generated
        _L22्) ड (L21            d.@4     // generated
        ्) ड (L21_               d.@4     // generated
        ्) ड (L21L22_            d.@4     // generated
        ्) ड (L21                d.@4     // generated
        _L21L23) ड (L21L20_      d.       // generated
        _L21L23) ड (L21L20       d.       // generated
        L21L23) ड (L21L20_       d.       // generated
        L21L23) ड (L21L20        d.       // generated
        _L22) ड (L21्_           d.@4     // generated
        _L22) ड (L21्            d.@4     // generated
        _L22L22) ड (L21्_        d.@4     // generated
        _L22L22) ड (L21्         d.@4     // generated
        L22) ड (L21्_            d.@4     // generated
        L22) ड (L21्             d.@4     // generated
        _ा) ड (L21L21_           d.       // generated
        _L22ा) ड (L21L21_        d.       // generated
        ा) ड (L21L21_            d.       // generated
        _L21) ड (L21L22्         d.       // generated
        _L22L21) ड (L21L22्      d.       // generated
        L21) ड (L21L22्          d.       // generated
        _L22) ड (L24_            d.@4     // generated
        _L22) ड (L24L22_         d.@4     // generated
        _L22) ड (L24             d.@4     // generated
        _L22L22) ड (L24_         d.@4     // generated
        _L22L22) ड (L24L22_      d.@4     // generated
        _L22L22) ड (L24          d.@4     // generated
        L22) ड (L24_             d.@4     // generated
        L22) ड (L24L22_          d.@4     // generated
        L22) ड (L24              d.@4     // generated
        _L20) ड (L21L23_         d.       // generated
        _L20) ड (L21L23          d.       // generated
        _L22L20) ड (L21L23_      d.       // generated
        _L22L20) ड (L21L23       d.       // generated
        L20) ड (L21L23_          d.       // generated
        L20) ड (L21L23           d.       // generated
        _L22) ड (L21L22L23       d.@4     // generated
        _L22L22) ड (L21L22L23    d.@4     // generated
        L22) ड (L21L22L23        d.@4     // generated
        _L22) ड (L21_            d.@4     // generated
        _L22L22) ड (L21_         d.@4     // generated
        L22) ड (L21_             d.@4     // generated
        _L22) ड (L23_            d.@4     // generated
        _L22) ड (L23L22_         d.@4     // generated
        _L22) ड (L23             d.@4     // generated
        _L22L22) ड (L23_         d.@4     // generated
        _L22L22) ड (L23L22_      d.@4     // generated
        _L22L22) ड (L23          d.@4     // generated
        L22) ड (L23_             d.@4     // generated
        L22) ड (L23L22_          d.@4     // generated
        L22) ड (L23              d.@4     // generated
        _L22) ड (L21L22ण         d.       // generated
        _L22) ड (लL21_           d.       // generated
        _L22L22) ड (लL21_        d.       // generated
        L22) ड (लL21_            d.       // generated
        _L20) ड (L21ण_           d.       // generated
        _L22L20) ड (L21ण_        d.       // generated
        L20) ड (L21ण_            d.       // generated
        _L20) ड (L21L22्         d.       // generated
        _L22L20) ड (L21L22्      d.       // generated
        L20) ड (L21L22्          d.       // generated
        ड (B       d.

        ड्ड          d.:V   // d. d. -> d.:
        ड्ड (B      d.:

        ड्ढ          d.#:V    // d#d# -> d#:
        ड्ढ (B       d.#:


        ड़         r.V
        ड़ (B      r.
